Indiana, session 2026, HB1078.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-30-2-2.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.8. (a) "Digital lottery" means a lottery technology
solution that allows lottery players to participate in lottery games
through digital distribution channels.
(b) The term does not include a lottery courier service.
SECTION 2. IC 4-30-2-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. "Draw game" means a lottery game in which
winners are determined by a random selection authorized by the
commission at a designated selection event.
SECTION 3. IC 4-30-2-3.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.8. "eInstant game" means a digital lottery game
that, upon the reveal of numbers, plays symbols, or other insignia,
immediately indicating whether the player has won a prize.
SECTION 4. IC 4-30-2-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
HB 1078—LS 6412/DI 107


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. "Video lottery terminal" means an electronic or
electromechanical video game machine that, upon payment
through the machine or other means of cash, electronic cards,
credits, vouchers, or other consideration, or a combination of cash,
electronic cards, credits, vouchers, or other consideration, is
available to play or simulate the play of a video game, including
poker, line up, and blackjack, using a video display and
microprocessors from which the player may receive free games or
credits that may be redeemed for cash, merchandise, or other
things of value.
SECTION 5. IC 4-30-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The commission shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 governing the establishment, implementation, and operation
of the lottery, including the following:
(1) The type of lottery games to be conducted, except that:
(A) the name of an elected official may not appear on a ticket
or play slip of a lottery game, on a prize, or on an instrument
used for the payment of prizes, unless the prize is in the form
of a state warrant; and
(B) coins or currency may not be dispensed from an electronic
computer terminal or device used in a lottery game.
(2) The sales price of tickets.
(3) The number and size of prizes.
(4) The method of selecting winning tickets. However, if a lottery
game involves a drawing, the drawing must be public and
witnessed by an independent certified public accountant. The
equipment used in the drawing shall be inspected before and after
the drawing.
(5) The manner of payment of prizes to holders of winning tickets.
(6) The frequency of drawings of winning tickets.
(7) The number and type of locations at which tickets may be
purchased.
(8) The method to be used in selling tickets.
(9) The manner and amount of compensation of retailers.
(10) The feasibility of using for a lottery game a terminal or
device that may be operated solely by the player without the
assistance of a retailer.
(11) A system of internal audits.
(12) The establishment of a code of ethics for officers and
employees of the commission.
HB 1078—LS 6412/DI 107


(13) The bulk purchase of lottery products.
(14) The sale of draw games and eInstant games over the
Internet as authorized by section 20(c) of this chapter.
(14) (15) Any other matters necessary or desirable for the
efficient or economical operation of the lottery or for the
convenience of the public.
(b) The rules adopted under subsection (a)(14) must include the
following:
(1) Rules requiring a contractor operating a digital
distribution channel for the sale of digital lottery games to:
(A) employ a method to detect the physical location of an
individual who purchases a digital lottery game; and
(B) not accept payment for a digital lottery game from an
individual who is located outside of Indiana.
(2) Rules requiring a contractor operating a digital
distribution channel for the sale of digital lottery games to
verify that an individual who is less than eighteen (18) years
of age does not purchase a digital lottery game.
(3) Rules ensuring that:
(A) the verification process under subdivision (2):
(i) uses commercially reasonable standards; and
(ii) makes a determination based on evidence more
reliable than an individual's attestation; and
(B) information collected during the verification process
under subdivision (2) is kept in a secure manner.
SECTION 6. IC 4-30-3-17.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17.5. (a) The commission shall, in cooperation with
the commission's contractor operating a digital distribution
channel for the sale of digital lottery games, establish a retailer
incentive program for retailers that participate in the promotion
of digital lottery games.
(b) The commission shall annually do the following at a public
meeting:
(1) Review the impact of the sale of online lottery games on
retailers that sell lottery games.
(2) Assess whether the retailer incentive program established
under subsection (a) has been effective in supporting retailer
participation in the promotion of digital lottery games.
(3) Recommend changes to the retailer incentive program, if
the commission finds that the program has not been effective
under subdivision (2).
HB 1078—LS 6412/DI 107


SECTION 7. IC 4-30-3-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) an activity specifically authorized by:
(A) IC 4-29 or IC 4-29.5 (tribal gaming and tribal-state
compact);
(B) IC 4-31 (pari-mutuel wagering on horse races);
(C) IC 4-33 (riverboat gambling);
(D) IC 4-35 (gambling games at racetracks); or
(E) IC 4-38 (sports wagering);
(2) the purchase of a tangible lottery ticket for a lottery game
from:
(A) a retailer authorized to sell lottery tickets under IC 4-30-9;
or
(B) the commission; or
(3) a free:
(A) interactive game; or
(B) promotional game;
offered by the commission.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), unless specifically
granted authority by a statute passed by the general assembly, the
commission and Indiana gaming commission shall not, independently
or by public-private partnership, operate or authorize the use or
operation of the following:
(1) A lottery game operated through a video lottery terminal.
(2) A video gaming terminal. A digital lottery game that
simulates the play of slot machines using visualizations of the
essential features of a gambling game played on a slot
machine, including spinning reels, a slot machine pull
mechanism, a spinning drum, and varied pay lines that reveal
winning outcomes.
(3) A lottery courier service.
(4) The sale of digital representations of
(A) casino-style games, including:
(i) (A) poker;
(ii) (B) roulette;
(iii) (C) slot machines; or
(iv) (D) blackjack;
over the Internet.
(B) scratch-off games; or
(C) draw games.
(c) The commission may operate or authorize the use or
HB 1078—LS 6412/DI 107


operation of the sale of the following digital lottery games over the
Internet:
(1) Draw games.
(2) eInstant games.
SECTION 8. IC 4-30-3-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) The commission shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to establish and implement a voluntary exclusion
program that provides the following:
(1) That a person who participates in the program agrees to
refrain from purchasing digital lottery games.
(2) That the name of a person participating in the program
will be included on a list of persons excluded from purchasing
digital lottery games under the jurisdiction of the commission.
(3) That a contractor operating a digital distribution channel
for the sale of digital lottery games under the jurisdiction of
the commission shall make all reasonable attempts, as
determined by the commission, to cease all direct marketing
efforts to a person participating in the program.
(4) That a contractor operating a digital distribution channel
for the sale of digital lottery games under the jurisdiction of
the commission may not accept payment or extend credit in
any manner to a person participating in the program.
However, the program does not preclude the commission or
a contractor from seeking the payment of a debt accrued by
a person before entering the program.
(5) The list of patrons entering the program and the personal
information of the participants are confidential. The
commission may only disseminate the list to:
(A) the owner or operator of a digital lottery distribution
channel, under the jurisdiction of the commission for
enforcement purposes; and
(B) an entity, upon the request of the entity and approval
by the commission.
(b) The commission may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2:
(1) to impose fines, fees, or civil penalties for a violation of this
section; and
(2) to promote the efficient or economical operation and
oversight of the voluntary exclusion program.
HB 1078—LS 6412/DI 107


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Public Policy, to which was
referred House Bill 1078, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1078 as introduced.)
MANNING
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 3
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1078 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, line 14, after "7." insert "(a)".
Page 3, between lines 6 and 7, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) The rules adopted under subsection (a)(14) must include the
following:
(1) Rules requiring a contractor operating a digital
distribution channel for the sale of digital lottery games to:
(A) employ a method to detect the physical location of an
individual who purchases a digital lottery game; and
(B) not accept payment for a digital lottery game from an
individual who is located outside of Indiana.
(2) Rules requiring a contractor operating a digital
distribution channel for the sale of digital lottery games to
verify that an individual who is less than eighteen (18) years
of age does not purchase a digital lottery game.
(3) Rules ensuring that:
(A) the verification process under subdivision (2):
(i) uses commercially reasonable standards; and
(ii) makes a determination based on evidence more
reliable than an individual's attestation; and
(B) information collected during the verification process
under subdivision (2) is kept in a secure manner.
SECTION 6. IC 4-30-3-17.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17.5. (a) The commission shall, in cooperation with
the commission's contractor operating a digital distribution
channel for the sale of digital lottery games, establish a retailer
incentive program for retailers that participate in the promotion
HB 1078—LS 6412/DI 107


of digital lottery games.
(b) The commission shall annually do the following at a public
meeting:
(1) Review the impact of the sale of online lottery games on
retailers that sell lottery games.
(2) Assess whether the retailer incentive program established
under subsection (a) has been effective in supporting retailer
participation in the promotion of digital lottery games.
(3) Recommend changes to the retailer incentive program, if
the commission finds that the program has not been effective
under subdivision (2).".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to HB 1078 as printed January 8, 2026.)
CLERE
HB 1078—LS 6412/DI 107